Louisiana, session 2026, HB966.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The portion of Louisiana Highway 15 in Monroe, Louisiana, between
South Second Street and United States Highway 165, otherwise known as Winnsboro Road,
shall be known and is hereby designated as the "President Barack Obama Road".
Section 2. The Department of Transportation and Development or its contractors are
hereby directed to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting this designation
provided local or private monies are received by the department equal to the department's
actual costs for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the signage, not to
exceed the sum of seven hundred fifty dollars per sign.